Mississippi statutes. Title 9. Courts
Chapter 9. County Courts
§ 9-9-18.2.
County court judge for Pearl River County.

In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the courts and in the youth court of Pearl River County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be a county court with one (1) county judge for Pearl River County, provided for and elected as herein set out.

The county court of Pearl River County may, in the discretion of the county judge, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

The initial holder of the judgeship created by this section shall be elected in the regular election of November 2010; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than sixty (60) days before that election.The person elected shall begin the term of office in January of 2011 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shall be no vacancy of the office before that time.Thereafter, the judge shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally.

The Board of Supervisors of Pearl River County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of the judge, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes.The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 442, § 1, eff June 21, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 9-9-18.3.
Additional county court judges for Lauderdale County.

In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of Lauderdale County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for Lauderdale County, provided for and elected as herein set out.

For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the presently existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as “Place One” and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as “Place Two.” There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of Lauderdale County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. Should neither judge of the county court have served longer in office than the other, then that judge of the county court who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the said county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of Lauderdale County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of said court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

The initial holder of the additional judgeship created by this section, or “Place Two,” shall be elected in the regular election of November 2006; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than forty-five (45) days before that election. The person elected shall begin the term of office in January of 2007 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shall be no vacancy of the office before that time. Thereafter the two (2) judges shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally.

The Board of Supervisors of Lauderdale County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes. The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 507, § 1, eff June 30, 2006 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 9-9-18.5.
Additional county court judge for DeSoto County.

In order to relieve the crowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youth court of DeSoto County and particularly to facilitate and make possible the trial and disposition of the large number of causes on the docket and in the youth court, there shall be two (2) county judges for DeSoto County, provided for and elected as herein set out.

For the purposes of nomination and election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct, the first existing judgeship and its succession to be denominated for purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as “Place One” and the judgeship hereby created and its succession for said selfsame purposes and none other to be designated as “Place Two.” There shall be no distinction whatsoever in the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of county judge, except that the county judge of DeSoto County who has been for the longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets. Should neither judge of the county court have served longer in office than the other, then that judge who has been for the longest time a member of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes, terms and dockets.

While there shall be no limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the county judges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws of this state, the county court of DeSoto County may, in the discretion of the county judge who has been for the longest time continuously a judge of the court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal and youth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of an order upon the minutes of the court.

The initial holder of the additional judgeship created by this section, or “Place Two,” shall be elected in the regular election of November 2008; candidates therefor shall qualify to run not later than forty-five (45) days before that election. The term of office of the person elected shall begin on the first day of January following the November election and shall end at the same time as for county judges generally. The two (2) judges shall otherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as provided for county judges generally.

The Board of Supervisors of DeSoto County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend monies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salaries of judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youth court division of the county court, including the related facilities of the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shall be expended for no other purposes. The county shall not be reimbursed for the amount of any such levy provided for by this section under the terms of the Homestead Exemption Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 395, § 1, eff July 16, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the addition of this section).

§ 9-9-18.6.
Additional county court judge for Lee County.

In order to relieve thecrowded condition of the docket in the county court and in the youthcourt of Lee County and particularly to facilitate and make possiblethe trial and disposition of the large number of causes in the youthcourt, there shall be two (2) county judges for Lee County, providedfor and elected as herein set out.

For the purposes of nominationand election, the two (2) judgeships shall be separate and distinct,with the county judgeship that existed on January 1, 2018, to be denominatedfor purposes of appointment, nomination and election only as “PlaceOne” and the additional judgeship hereby created to be designatedas “Place Two.” There shall be no distinction whatsoeverin the powers, duties and emoluments of the two (2) offices of countyjudge, except that the county judge of Lee County who has been forthe longest time continuously a county judge of the county shall havethe right to assign causes, terms and dockets. Should neither judgeof the county court have served longer in office than the other, thenthat judge of the county court who has been for the longest time amember of The Mississippi Bar shall have the right to assign causes,terms and dockets.

While there shall beno limitation whatsoever upon the powers and duties of the countyjudges other than as cast upon them by the Constitution and laws ofthis state, the county court of Lee County may, in the discretionof the county judge who has been for the longest time continuouslya judge of the court, be divided into civil, equity, criminal andyouth court divisions as a matter of convenience by the entry of anorder upon the minutes of the court.

The initial holder ofthe additional judgeship created by this section, or “PlaceTwo,” shall be elected in the regular election of November2018. The person elected shall begin the term of office in January2019 at the same time as county judges generally, and there shallbe no vacancy of the office before that time. The two (2) judges shallotherwise be elected, and any vacancy in office filled, as providedfor county judges generally.

Each county judge shallappoint a court reporter in accordance with Section 9-13-61 for thepurpose of doing the necessary stenographic work of the court.

The Board of Supervisorsof Lee County may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expendmonies from the general fund to be used in the payment of salariesof judges, clerks, reporters, officers and employees of the youthcourt division of the county court, including the related facilitiesof the youth court division of the county court, and such funds shallbe expended for no other purposes. The county shall not be reimbursedfor the amount of any such levy provided for by this section underthe terms of the Homestead Exemption Law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 418, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 2018).

§ 9-9-19.
Term of court fixed.

A term of court shall be held in the county courthouse of the county, beginning on the second Monday of each month and continuing so long as may be necessary; but in counties where there are two (2) circuit court districts the county court shall meet alternately in the two (2) districts in the county courthouse in the same month and in the same district as the board of supervisors of said county holds its meetings. Provided that in the County of Jones, a county having two (2) judicial districts, that a term shall be held in the second judicial district of said county on the second Monday of each month; and provided that in the first judicial district a term shall be held on the fourth Monday of January, the fourth Monday of March, the fourth Monday of April, the fourth Monday of June and the fourth Monday of October. Provided that in the County of Hinds, a county having two (2) judicial districts, a term shall be held in the first judicial district on the second Monday of each month and in the second judicial district on the second Monday of March, June, September and December, and provided further that, when such terms are held concurrently, either of the county judges of Hinds County may be assigned to hold all or any part of such terms in either of the two (2) judicial districts. Provided, further, that in the County of Bolivar, a county having two (2) judicial districts, a term shall be held in the first judicial district on the second Monday of April, August and December, and in the second judicial district on the second Monday of January, February, March, May, June, July, September, October and November. Provided, however, that in the County of Harrison, a county having two (2) county judges and two (2) judicial districts, that a term shall be held in each judicial district concurrently each month. Provided, however, that the judge of the county court for good cause shown may, by order spread on the minutes of the county court, designate some place other than the county courthouse for the holding of such term of the county court as may be designated in said order. The county judge may call a special term of the county court upon giving ten (10) days’ notice, and such notice shall be given by posting the same at the front door of the courthouse in said county and by the publication of said notice for one insertion in some newspaper of general circulation in the county.

If a county court is established pursuant to an agreement between two or more counties as provided in Section 9-9-3, the terms thereof shall remain continuously open and shall not be closed and the judge of such court shall sit in rotation in the county seat of each county, beginning on Monday of each week for at least a week in each county in each month.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 693, 702; 1942, §§ 1604, 1613; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1934, ch. 236; Laws, 1936, chs. 234, 247; Laws, 1948, ch. 236; Laws, 1950, chs. 319, 321; Laws, 1958, ch. 231, § 5; Laws, 1962, chs. 300, 301, 302; Laws, 1964, ch. 322; Laws, 1966, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1970, chs. 335, § 1, 336, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 1972, ch. 348, § 2, eff from and after October 1, 1972.

§ 9-9-21.
Jurisdiction.

The jurisdiction of the county court shall be as follows: It shall have jurisdiction concurrent with the justice court in all matters, civil and criminal of which the justice court has jurisdiction; and it shall have jurisdiction concurrent with the circuit and chancery courts in all matters of law and equity wherein the amount of value of the thing in controversy shall not exceed, exclusive of costs and interest, the sum of Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00), and the jurisdiction of the county court shall not be affected by any setoff, counterclaim or cross-bill in such actions where the amount sought to be recovered in such setoff, counterclaim or cross-bill exceeds Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00). Provided, however, the party filing such setoff, counterclaim or cross-bill which exceeds Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) shall give notice to the opposite party or parties as provided in Section 13-3-83, and on motion of all parties filed within twenty (20) days after the filing of such setoff, counterclaim or cross-bill, the county court shall transfer the case to the circuit or chancery court wherein the county court is situated and which would otherwise have jurisdiction. It shall have exclusively the jurisdiction heretofore exercised by the justice court in the following matters and causes: namely, eminent domain, the partition of personal property, and actions of unlawful entry and detainer, provided that the actions of eminent domain and unlawful entry and detainer may be returnable and triable before the judge of said court in vacation. The county court shall have jurisdiction over criminal matters in the county assigned by a judge of the circuit court district in which the county is included.

In the event of the establishment of a county court by an agreement between two (2) or more counties as provided in Section 9-9-3, it shall be lawful for such court sitting in one (1) county to act upon any and all matters of which it has jurisdiction as provided by law arising in the other county under the jurisdiction of said court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 693; 1942, § 1604; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1934, ch. 236; Laws, 1936, ch. 247; Laws, 1948, ch. 236; Laws, 1950, ch. 321; Laws, 1962, ch. 300; Laws, 1964, ch. 322; Laws, 1966, ch. 344, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 477, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 348; Laws, 1991, ch. 311, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 361, § 1, eff October 22, 2013 (the date of the United States Attorney General’s response to the submission of this section under Section 5 of the Voting Right Act of 1965).

§ 9-9-23.
Powers of county judge.

The county judge shall have power to issue writs, and to try matters, of habeas corpus on application to him therefor, or when made returnable before him by a superior judge. He shall also have the power to order the issuance of writs of certiorari, supersedeas, attachments, and other remedial writs in all cases pending in, or within the jurisdiction of, his court. He shall have the authority to issue search warrants in his county returnable to his own court or to any court of a justice of the peace within his county in the same manner as is provided by law for the issuance of search warrants by justices of the peace. In all cases pending in, or within the jurisdiction of, his court, he shall have, in term time, and in vacation, the power to order, do or determine to the same extent and in the same manner as a justice of the peace or a circuit judge or a chancellor could do in term time or in vacation in such cases. But he shall not have original power to issue writs of injunction, or other remedial writs in equity or in law except in those cases hereinabove specified as being within his jurisdiction: Provided, however, that when any judge or chancellor authorized to issue such writs of injunction, or any other equitable or legal remedial writs hereinabove reserved, shall so direct in writing the hearing of application therefor may be by him referred to the county judge, in which event the said direction of the superior judge shall vest in the said county judge all authority to take such action on said application as the said superior judge could have taken under the right and the law, had the said application been at all times before the said superior judge. The jurisdiction authorized under the foregoing proviso shall cease upon the denying or granting of the application.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 698; 1942, § 1609; Laws, 1926, ch. 131.

§ 9-9-25.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-9-25. [Codes, 1942, § 1614; Laws, 1934, ch. 237]

§ 9-9-27.
Transfer of cases; prosecution by affidavit.

In any civil case instituted in the circuit court, wherein all parties file a motion to transfer said case to the county court for trial, or wherein all parties file an instrument of writing consenting to such a transfer, the circuit court may, in its discretion, transfer the case to the county court for trial; and the said county court shall have full jurisdiction of and shall proceed to try any case so transferred, provided, however, that such order of transfer be rendered prior to the empaneling of the jury in such cases.

In misdemeanor cases and in felony cases not capital, wherein indictments have been returned by the grand jury, the circuit court may transfer with full jurisdiction all or any of the same, in its discretion, to the county court for trial; and the said county court shall have jurisdiction of and shall proceed to try all charges of misdemeanor which may be preferred by the district attorney or by the county prosecuting attorney or by the sheriff on affidavit sworn to before the circuit clerk of the county; and prosecutions by affidavit are hereby authorized in misdemeanor cases under the same procedure as if indictments had been returned in the circuit court and same had been transferred to the county court.

And, provided further, any reputable citizen may make an affidavit charging crime before the judge of the county court, and such affidavit shall be filed with the clerk of the county court, and if the crime charged is a misdemeanor, the county court shall have jurisdiction to try and dispose of said charge and, if the crime charged be a felony, the county judge shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine said cause, the same as now provided by law to be done by justices of the peace, and to commit the person so charged, with or without bail as the evidence may warrant, or to discharge the defendant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 694; 1942, § 1605; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1944, ch. 191; Laws, 1952, ch. 255.

§ 9-9-29.
Court of record; duties of circuit clerk and sheriff; fees.

The county court shall be a court of record and the clerk of the circuit court shall be the clerk of the county court, and he or his deputy shall attend all the sessions of the county court, and have present at all sessions, all books, records, files, and papers pertaining to the term then in session. The dockets, minutes, and records of the county court shall be kept, so far as is practicable, in the same manner as are those of the circuit court as provided by statute and the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure. The sheriff shall be the executive officer of the county court; he shall by himself, or deputy, attend all its sessions, and he shall serve all process and execute all writs issued therefrom in the manner as such process and writs would be served and executed when issued by the justice courts, or by the circuit or chancery courts according as appertains to the value of the cause or matter in hand. The clerk and sheriff shall receive the same fees for attendance, and for other services as are allowed by law to the clerk and to the sheriffs for like duties in the circuit and chancery courts; provided however, that in all cases where the justice courts have concurrent jurisdiction with the county court, the clerk shall be allowed to receive only such fees as are allowed to justice courts, and the sheriff shall be allowed only such fees as the constable in said justice court would be entitled to under the law for similar services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 699; 1942, § 1610; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1928, Ex. ch. 66; Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§ 9-9-31.
Duties of prosecuting attorney.

The county prosecuting attorney shall be the prosecuting attorney of the county court, and he shall prosecute all cases therein which he is now required by law to prosecute, and all cases appealed from the county court to the circuit court, in which it is the duty of the county attorney, under the law, to appear and prosecute.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 701; 1942, § 1612; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1978, ch. 509, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 1980.

§ 9-9-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1991, ch. 573, § 141, eff from and after July 1, 1991.

§9-9-33. [Codes, 1930, § 703; 1942, § 1615; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1966, ch. 347, § 1]

§ 9-9-35.
Circuit judges authorized to assign cases and other court duties to county judges where dockets overcrowded.

In any county in cases where an overcrowded docket justifies the same, any circuit judge may assign to a county judge in said county only, for hearing and final disposition, any case, cause, hearing or motion, or any proceedings involved in the trial and final disposition thereof.

All orders in said cause, trial or hearing may be signed as follows: “ _______________County Judge and Acting Circuit Judge by assignment.” No special order evidencing said assignment shall be entered on the minutes, except in cases where a county judge is assigned the duty of opening and organizing a court where a grand jury is to be impaneled, in which case an order so assigning the said county judge to act shall be signed and entered on the minutes of the court on the opening day thereof.

No compensation for said services shall be allowed said county judge, neither shall said county judge be compelled to accept any assignment except at his will.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1605.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 303; Laws, 1982, ch. 476, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 378, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 361, § 3, October 22, 2013 (the date of the United States Attorney General’s response to the submission of this section under Section 5 of the Voting Right Act of 1965).

§ 9-9-36.
Chancellors authorized to assign cases and other court duties to county judges where dockets overcrowded.

In any county in cases where an overcrowded docket justifies the same, any chancellor may assign to a county judge in that county only, for hearing and final disposition, any case, cause, hearing or motion, or any proceedings involved in the trial and final disposition thereof.

All orders in the cause, trial or hearing may be signed as follows: “ _______________County Judge and Acting Chancellor by assignment.” No special order evidencing the assignment shall be entered on the minutes.

No compensation for those services shall be allowed the county judge, neither shall the county judge be compelled to accept any assignment except at his will. Furthermore, no assignment of any cause or hearing shall be made where counsel on both sides object to the assignment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 378, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 486, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 442, § 3, eff June 21, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the bringing forward without change of this section).

§ 9-9-37.
Certain counties may establish or abolish court.

From and after July 1, 2013, or the date this section is effectuated under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, whichever is later, in any county not brought within the provisions of this chapter by the terms of Sections 9-9-1 and 9-9-3, the board of supervisors is authorized to determine whether a county court shall be established in the county. If a majority of the board are in favor of a county court, then the board shall so certify to the Secretary of State and the Governor shall then issue a proclamation establishing the county court in the county; and thereafter at the next succeeding meeting of the board of supervisors the board shall call an election for the election of a county judge, and the election shall be conducted in the way and manner now provided by law for holding a special election.

Any county not brought within the provisions of this chapter by the terms of Sections 9-9-1 and 9-9-3 that has a county court established under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section may thereafter come from under this chapter in the manner hereinafter provided. On petition of twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the county, addressed to the board of supervisors of the county, an election shall be called by the board of supervisors and conducted in the way and manner now provided by law for a special election for the purpose of determining whether the county court shall be abolished; and, if the majority vote at the election is in favor of abolishing the county court, then the election commission shall so certify to the Secretary of State. The Governor shall then issue a proclamation declaring that the county court in said county be abolished on the first day of the month next succeeding the election.

If a county court is abolished under the provisions of this subsection (2), the board of supervisors is not authorized to establish a county court within less than two (2) years thereafter.

The salary of the county judge shall be as provided in Section 9-9-11.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 697, 706; 1942, §§ 1608, 1618; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; Laws, 1932, ch. 200; Laws, 1934, ch. 233; Laws, 1936, ch. 254; Laws, 1946, ch. 370; Laws, 1950, ch. 251; Laws, 1952, ch. 238; Laws, 1954, ch. 230; Laws, 1954, Ex Sess ch. 15; Laws, 1955 Ex. ch. 39, § 1; Laws, 1956, chs. 231, §§ 1, 2, 233; Laws, 1960, ch. 234; Laws, 1966, ch. 345, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 311, § 2; Laws, 1970, ch. 402, § 4; Laws, 1971, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 502, § 61; Laws, 2013, ch. 383, § 1, eff October 22, 2013 (the date of the United States Attorney General’s response to the submission of this section under Section 5 of the Voting Right Act of 1965).

§ 9-9-39.
Effect of abolition of county court; pending matters transferred.

All pending matters in any county court that may be abolished shall be transferred to the court of proper jurisdiction without the necessity for any motion or order of court for such transfer or for reformation of pleadings, and final judgments or decrees in causes transferred shall include costs incurred in the county court. After abolishment of a county court, executions and all process on final judgments or decrees theretofore entered therein shall be issued by the clerk of the circuit court of the county and made returnable to any court in the county where rendered then having jurisdiction of the subject-matter involved or of any of the parties, and the court to which such executions or process is returned shall have jurisdiction thereof and try all issues pertaining thereto.

After the abolishment of a county court, the circuit clerk of the county shall be the official custodian of all its records and may certify to copies thereof under his seal. When the result of an appeal to the supreme court shall be a reversal of the circuit court and in material particulars in effect an affirmance of the judgment of a county court which has been abolished, the supreme court shall enter judgment in the cause or remand it to the circuit court which shall have full jurisdiction thereof and shall enter final judgment in accordance with the opinion and fiat of the supreme court or proceed as the supreme court may otherwise direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1619; Laws, 1932, ch. 200.

§ 9-9-41.
Court may be abolished in certain counties.

In any county in which there is a city of more than thirteen thousand six hundred inhabitants and less than fourteen thousand inhabitants, as shown by the next preceding regular federal census, and having a county court established by Section 9-9-1, the board of supervisors shall, on petition of not less than twenty per cent (20%) of the qualified electors of said county, call an election for the purpose of ascertaining whether said court shall be abolished. Said election shall be held in the manner provided by law for holding general elections and at least three weeks’ notice thereof shall be given by publication in some newspaper having a general circulation within the county.

The tickets used at said election shall have on their face the following:

For abolishing the county court of_______________county ( )

Against abolishing the county court of_______________county ( )

and the voters shall vote by placing a cross mark after one of said

propositions.

In the event a majority of the qualified electors of said county voting in said election vote in favor of the abolition of said court then the same shall immediately cease to exist and the clerk of the circuit court shall transfer all cases pending on the docket of said court. Those cases involving misdemeanors or amounts under two hundred dollars shall be transferred to the proper justice of the peace and those involving over two hundred dollars shall be transferred to the circuit court of the county.

In the event said county court is abolished as hereinabove provided, all executions or garnishments issued on judgment rendered by said court shall be returnable before the circuit court of the county and shall be disposed of just as if the judgment had been rendered by said circuit court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1620; Laws, 1938, ch. 284; Laws, 1950, ch. 352.

§ 9-9-43.
Legislative action or election required to abolish courts in certain counties.

In any county now having a county court established by Chapter 131 of the laws of 1926 and having only one judicial district therein and in which the assessed valuation of real and personal property has fallen below seventeen million dollars but exceeds fifteen million dollars according to the assessment of 1932, and in which the urban population exceeds the rural population, and having therein a municipality in excess of 15,000 population, according to the last federal census, said county court shall remain in existence until abolished by a direct act of the legislature or by an election as now provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1621; Laws, 1934, ch. 235.

§ 9-9-45.
When other counties become eligible for establishment or abolition of court.

When hereafter any county of the state shall become eligible by reason of the growth in population, in assessed valuation and the existence therein of a municipality of the number of inhabitants all as specified in Section 9-9-1 of this chapter, it shall be the duty of the Governor, upon the determination by him of the facts aforesaid, to issue his public proclamation establishing a county court in the said county, and calling an election on a date to be fixed in said proclamation for the election of a county judge. The term of office of a county judge elected under this section and Section 9-9-39 shall expire thereafter at the same time at which there expires the regular terms of circuit judges and chancellors. When in the last year of any four-year judicial period any county has fallen below the requirements of eligibility as stated in Section 9-9-1 of this chapter, it shall be the duty of the Governor so to ascertain and proclaim, thereupon after the expiration of the then four-year term, the county court shall cease to exist in such county, unless by an election held under the provisions of Section 9-9-39 the said court be retained or reestablished.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 707; 1942, § 1622; Laws, 1926, ch. 131; brought forward without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 442, § 4, eff June 21, 2010 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the bringing forward without change of this section).